Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.693

Graduation rate improvement—Student progression understandings.

Each institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 may enter into a student progression understanding with an interested student. The terms of the understanding shall permit a student to obtain a degree or certificate within the standard period of time assumed for a full-time student pursuing that degree or certificate. Usually, the standard amount of time will be about two years for an associate of arts degree and about four years for a baccalaureate degree. Student progression understandings shall not give rise to any cause of action on behalf of any student as a result of the failure of any state institution of higher education to fulfill its obligations under the student progression understanding.

[ 1993 c 414 s 4.]